North Dakota statutes. TITLE 8 Carriage
CHAPTER 8-02 Carriage of Persons

8-02-01.
Gratuitous carrier — Degree of care required.

A carrier of persons without reward shall use ordinary care and diligence for their safe carriage, except as the carrier’s liability is limited by the provisions of title 39.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1214; R.C. 1895, § 4180; R.C. 1899, § 4180; R.C. 1905, § 5628; C.L. 1913, § 6191; R.C. 1943, § 8-0201.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2096.

Collateral References.

Guests: duty and liability to guest or passenger as to preflight inspection and maintenance of aircraft, 30 A.L.R.2d 1172.

Guests: liability for injury to guest in airplane, 40 A.L.R.3d 1117.

Duty and liability of carrier as affected by status of employee or his family traveling on employer’s interstate conveyance by means of pass issued pursuant to specific provision of employment or collective bargaining agreement, 55 A.L.R.2d 766.

Guest statute, airplane as “motor vehicle” within, 98 A.L.R.2d 543, 544.

8-02-02.
Carrier for reward — Degree of care required.

A carrier of persons for reward shall use the utmost care and diligence for their safe carriage, shall provide everything necessary for that purpose, and shall exercise to that end a reasonable degree of skill.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1215; R.C. 1895, § 4181; R.C. 1899, § 4181; R.C. 1905, § 5629; C.L. 1913, § 6192; R.C. 1943, § 8-0202.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2100.

8-02-03.
Safe vehicles required.

A carrier of persons for reward shall provide vehicles safe and fit for the purposes to which they are put and is not excused for default in this respect by any degree of care.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1216; R.C. 1895, § 4182; R.C. 1899, § 4182; R.C. 1905, § 5630; C.L. 1913, § 6193; R.C. 1943, § 8-0203.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2101.

8-02-04.
Overloading prohibited.

A carrier of persons for reward must not overcrowd nor overload the vehicle used for carriage.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1217; R.C. 1895, § 4183; R.C. 1899, § 4183; R.C. 1905, § 5631; C.L. 1913, § 6194; R.C. 1943, § 8-0204.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2102.

Cross-References.

Carrier must provide sufficient vehicles and seats, see § 8-08-05.

Collateral References.

Liability of carrier to passenger for injury due to crowded conditions of motor bus, or pushing or crowding of passengers therein, 26 A.L.R.2d 1219.

Overloading aircraft, liability for personal injury or death based on, 75 A.L.R.2d 868.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of third party’s assault on or about carrier’s vehicle or premises, 34 A.L.R.4th 1054.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of another passenger’s assault, 43 A.L.R.4th 189.

8-02-05.
Treatment of passengers.

A carrier of persons for reward shall give to passengers all such accommodations as are usual and reasonable and must treat them with civility and give them a reasonable degree of attention.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1218; R.C. 1895, § 4184; R.C. 1899, § 4184; R.C. 1905, § 5632; C.L. 1913, § 6195; R.C. 1943, § 8-0205.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2103.

8-02-06.
Rate of speed — Delays.

A carrier of persons for reward shall travel at a reasonable rate of speed without any unreasonable delay or deviation from the proper route.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1219; R.C. 1895, § 4185; R.C. 1899, § 4185; R.C. 1905, § 5633; C.L. 1913, § 6196; R.C. 1943, § 8-0206.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2104.

Collateral References.

Change of vehicles: duty and liability of carrier with respect to allowing passenger sufficient time for change of vehicles, 40 A.L.R.2d 809.

8-02-07.
Ridesharing arrangement — Definition.

“Carpool” means a ridesharing arrangement in a private passenger automobile or station wagon by two or more persons, regardless of their relationship to each other, to and from common or nearby employment sites. The term includes:

Shared-driving, in which the car of each person in the arrangement is used and alternated on an agreed-upon schedule; and

Shared-riding, in which the same car is used during the arrangement and each member contributes an agreed-upon amount to compensate for the cost of operating the pool.

“Ridesharing arrangement” means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where the transportation is incidental to another purpose of the driver or owner and is not provided for pecuniary gain. The term shall include ridesharing arrangements known as carpools and vanpools.

“Vanpool” means a ridesharing arrangement by a prearranged membership group whose members are picked up at specified points to be taken to and from common or nearby employment sites. The vanpool members each contribute an agreed-upon amount to compensate for the cost of operating the pool, the motor vehicle used is other than a passenger automobile or station wagon, and is manufactured and equipped to carry not more than fifteen persons, including the driver. The vanpool may be owner-operated or employer-sponsored.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 131, § 1.

8-02-08.
Safety standards for passenger contract carriers — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 91, § 1; 2001, ch. 105, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 280, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.